Nebraska, session 109, LB382A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $2,000,000 from the Medicaid
Managed Care Excess Profit Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $2,000,000 from the
Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of
Health and Human Services, for Program 571, to aid in carrying out the
provisions of Legislative Bill 382, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First
Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$2,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $2,000,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-